Wisconsin, session 2025, AB681.
do enact as follows:AB681,14Section 1. 343.303 of the statutes is amended to read:AB681,2,221343.303 Preliminary breath screening test. If a law enforcement officer 2has probable cause to believe that the person is violating or has violated s. 346.63 3(1) or (2m) or a local ordinance in conformity therewith, or s. 346.63 (2) or (6) or 4940.25 or s. 940.09 where the offense involved the use of a vehicle, or if the officer 5detects any presence of alcohol, a controlled substance, controlled substance analog 6or other drug, or a combination thereof, on a person driving or operating or on duty 7time with respect to a commercial motor vehicle or has reason to believe that the 8person is violating or has violated s. 346.63 (7) or a local ordinance in conformity 9therewith, the officer, prior to an arrest, may request the person to provide a sample 10of his or her breath or oral fluids, or both, for a preliminary breath screening test 11using a device approved by the department for this purpose. The result of this 12preliminary breath screening test may be used by the law enforcement officer for 13the purpose of deciding whether or not the person shall be arrested for a violation of 14s. 346.63 (1), (2m), (5) or (7) or a local ordinance in conformity therewith, or s. 15346.63 (2) or (6), 940.09 (1) or 940.25 and whether or not to require or request 16chemical tests as authorized under s. 343.305 (3). The result of the preliminary 17breath screening test shall not be admissible in any action or proceeding except to 18show probable cause for an arrest, if the arrest is challenged, or to prove that a 19chemical test was properly required or requested of a person under s. 343.305 (3). 20Following the screening test, additional tests may be required or requested of the 21driver under s. 343.305 (3). The general penalty provision under s. 939.61 (1) does 22not apply to a refusal to take a preliminary breath screening test.AB681,2,2323